Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 16. Off-road recreational vehicles

§ 31-5-1601.
Operation on highways.

An off-road recreational vehicle may be operated upon any public road rights-of-way, streets, roads or highways within Wyoming subject to the following conditions:

Off-road recreational vehicles may be operated on main-traveled roadways only upon that portion of a public road right-of-way, street, road or highway designated open by the state, local or federal agency with jurisdiction over the roadway and designated a Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trail pursuant to W.S.

31-2-701

through

31-2-707

by the department of state parks and cultural resources. No portion of a public road right-of-way, street, road or highway shall be designated as a Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trail by the department without the consent of the state, local or federal agency with jurisdiction over the roadway. Off-road recreational vehicles operated upon roadways designated as trails shall be subject only to the user registration fee prescribed by W.S.

31-2-703

and shall not be deemed a motorcycle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(E)(I) and 31-5-102(a)(xxii). Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to authorize the department to acquire or expand any public road right-of-way in order to accommodate the operation of off-road recreational vehicles;

Crossings of main-traveled roadways shall be made at right angles to the roadway or as nearly so as practicable, but in any case yielding the right-of-way to all traffic in the main-traveled roadway;

When operating at any time from one-half (1/2) hour after sunset to one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise, the off-road recreational vehicle shall be equipped with lighted lamps and illuminating devices in accordance with W.S.

31-5-910

through

31-5-940

;

The off-road recreational vehicle shall be equipped with an adequate braking device that may be operated either by hand or foot; and

If operated on state or federal lands, the off-road recreational vehicle shall be equipped with:

An approved spark arrester;

A noise muffler which produces a propulsion noise level of not more than one hundred two (102) decibels at twenty (20) inches in a stationary test.

Nothing in this section authorizes the operation of an off-road recreational vehicle upon a public road right-of-way, street, road or highway within Wyoming by a person who has not been issued a valid driver’s license or permit.

As used in this section, “public road right-of-way” means the entire right-of-way of a street, road or highway within Wyoming, including the traveled portions, banks, ditches, shoulders and medians of a street, road or highway.

Off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

may be operated upon any open public road rights-of-way, streets, roads or highways within Wyoming, notwithstanding the designation of the public road right-of-way, street, road or highway as a Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trail pursuant to W.S.

31-2-701

through

31-2-707

.

Off-road recreational vehicles shall not be operated on interstate highways.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 12, § 1; 2016 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 4, 2016; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2016 amendment,

inserted “any public road rights-of-way” in the introductory language of (a); inserted similar language twice in (a)(i) and once in (b); added the last sentence of (a)(i); and added (c).

Laws 2016, ch. 67, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (d) and (e).